District of Columbia statutes.
31-2801

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Ancillary services” means standard medical procedures that are reasonably necessary for the diagnosis and treatment of a patient.

(2)

“Emergency services” means:

(A)

Health care services furnished in the emergency department of a hospital for the treatment of a medical emergency;

(B)

Ancillary services routinely available to the emergency department of a hospital for the treatment of a medical emergency; and

(C)

Emergency medical services transportation.

(3)

“Medical emergency” means the sudden onset or sudden worsening of a medical condition that manifests itself by symptoms of sufficient severity, including severe pain, that the absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected by a prudent lay person, who possesses an average knowledge of health and medicine, to result in:

(A)

Placing the patient’s health in serious jeopardy;

(B)

Serious impairment to bodily functions; or

(C)

Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-145, § 2, 45 DCR 3785
1981 Ed., § 35-4801.